North Carolina, session 2025, HB618.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 6 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2A. Statewide Standing Order to Control the Spread of Disease.
"§ 130A-158.15. Statewide standing order for the dispensing of ivermectin.
(a) The State Health Director shall issue a statewide standing order authorizing a
pharmacist licensed under Article 4A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes to dispense
ivermectin suitable for human use without a written prescription or consultation with a healthcare
professional.
(b) A pharmacist licensed under Article 4A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes may
dispense ivermectin in accordance with the statewide standing order issued pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) All of the following individuals are immune from any civil or criminal liability for
actions authorized by this section as follows:
(1) The State Health Director acting pursuant to this section.
(2) Any pharmacist who dispenses ivermectin pursuant to a statewide standing
order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
"§§ 130A-158.16. through 130A-158.20. Reserved for future codification purposes."
SECTION 2. The State Health Director shall issue the statewide standing order
authorized by G.S. 130A-158.15(a), as enacted by Section 1 of this act, by October 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H618-v-1*